Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 6. PUBLIC OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

SUBTITLE A. PROVISIONS GENERALLY APPLICABLE TO PUBLIC OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

CHAPTER 617. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AND STRIKES

Sec. 617.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "labor organization" means any organization in which employees participate and that exists in whole or in part to deal with one or more employers concerning grievances, labor disputes, wages, hours of employment, or working conditions.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 617.002. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING BY PUBLIC EMPLOYEES PROHIBITED. (a) An official of the state or of a political subdivision of the state may not enter into a collective bargaining contract with a labor organization regarding wages, hours, or conditions of employment of public employees.

(b) A contract entered into in violation of Subsection (a) is void.

(c) An official of the state or of a political subdivision of the state may not recognize a labor organization as the bargaining agent for a group of public employees.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 617.0025. APPLICABILITY OF CHAPTER TO OPEN-ENROLLMENT CHARTER SCHOOL. (a) An open-enrollment charter school established under Subchapter D, Chapter 12, Education Code, is a political subdivision for purposes of this chapter.

(b) A member of the governing body of a charter holder, a member of the governing body of an open-enrollment charter school, and an officer of an open-enrollment charter school are considered to be officials of a political subdivision and an employee of an open-enrollment charter school is considered to be a public employee under this chapter.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 691 (S.B. 2293), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 617.003. PROHIBITION ON STRIKES BY PUBLIC EMPLOYEES. (a) Public employees may not strike or engage in an organized work stoppage against the state or a political subdivision of the state.

(b) A public employee who violates Subsection (a) forfeits all civil service rights, reemployment rights, and any other rights, benefits, and privileges the employee enjoys as a result of public employment or former public employment.

(c) The right of an individual to cease work may not be abridged if the individual is not acting in concert with others in an organized work stoppage.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 617.004. RIGHT TO WORK. An individual may not be denied public employment because of the individual's membership or nonmembership in a labor organization.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 617.005. EFFECT OF CHAPTER. This chapter does not impair the right of public employees to present grievances concerning their wages, hours of employment, or conditions of work either individually or through a representative that does not claim the right to strike.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.